Washington statutes.
RCW 16.36.110

Violations, gross misdemeanor—Injunction—Denial, revocation, or suspension of license.

(1) Any person who violates any provision of this chapter or the rules adopted under this chapter shall be guilty of a gross misdemeanor. Each day upon which a violation occurs constitutes a separate violation.

(2) The director may bring an action to enjoin the violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter in the superior court of Thurston county or of the county in which such violation occurs notwithstanding the existence of other remedies at law.

(3) The director may deny, revoke, or suspend any license issued under this chapter for any failure or refusal to comply with this chapter or rules adopted under this chapter. Upon notice by the director to deny, revoke, or suspend a license, a person may request a hearing under chapter 34.05 RCW.

[ 1998 c 8 s 13; 1989 c 354 s 35; 1981 c 296 s 14; 1957 c 22 s 5. Prior: 1953 c 17 s 8; 1927 c 165 s 33; RRS s 3142.]

NOTES:

Severability—1989 c 354: See note following RCW 15.36.012.

Severability—1981 c 296: See note following RCW 15.08.010.